Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 5
PUNITIVE ARTICLE

28-3.1-501. Principal defined.

A "principal", as used in this code, means any person punishable under this code who commits an offense punishable by this code or intentionally aids, abets, counsels, commands, solicits, or procures its commission or intentionally causes an act to be done which if directly performed by him or her would be punishable by this code.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 615, § 97, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 748, § 18, effective April 2.

28-3.1-502. Abetting offenders.

Any person subject to this code who, knowing that an offense punishable by this code has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent his or her apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 616, § 98, effective May 24.

28-3.1-503. Charges - offenses included.

An accused may be found guilty of an offense necessarily included in the offense charged or of an attempt to commit either the offense charged or of an offense necessarily included therein, but not both.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1185, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-504. Attempt to commit offense.

An act, done with specific intent to commit an offense under this code, amounting to more than mere preparation and tending even though failing to effect its commission, is an attempt to commit that offense.

Any person subject to this code who attempts to commit any offense punishable by this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs, unless otherwise specifically prescribed.

Any person subject to this code may be convicted of an attempt to commit an offense although it appears on the trial that the offense was consummated.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1186, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-505. Conspiracy to commit offense.

Any person subject to this code who conspires with any other person to commit an offense under this code shall, if one or more of the conspirators does an act to effect the object of the conspiracy, be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1186, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-506. Solicitation.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another to desert in violation of section 28-3.1-509 or mutiny in violation of section 28-3.1-518 shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Any person subject to this code who solicits or advises another to commit an act of misbehavior before the enemy or any hostile force in violation of section 28-3.1-523 or sedition in violation of section 28-3.1-518 shall be punished as court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1186, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-507. Fraudulent enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person shall be punished as a court-martial directs if he or she:

Procures his or her own enlistment or appointment in the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her qualifications or medical fitness for that enlistment or appointment and receives pay or allowances thereunder; or

Procures his or her own separation from the state military forces by knowingly false representation or deliberate concealment as to his or her eligibility for that separation.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1186, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 616, § 99, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 748, § 19, effective April 2.

28-3.1-508. Unlawful enlistment, appointment, or separation.

Any person subject to this code who effects an enlistment or appointment in or a separation from the state military forces of any person who is known to him or her to be ineligible for such enlistment, appointment, or separation because it is prohibited by law, regulation, or order shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1186, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 616, § 100, effective May 24.

28-3.1-509. Desertion.

Any member of the state military forces is guilty of desertion if he or she:

Without authority, goes or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to remain away therefrom permanently; or

Quits his or her unit, organization, or place of duty with intent to avoid hazardous duty or to shirk important service; or

Without being regularly separated from one of the state military forces, enlists or accepts an appointment in the same or another one of the state military forces or in one of the armed forces of the United States without fully disclosing the fact that he or she has not been regularly separated.

Any commissioned officer of the state military forces who, after tender of his or her resignation and before notice of its acceptance, quits his or her post or proper duties without leave and with intent to remain away therefrom permanently is guilty of desertion.

Any person found guilty of desertion or attempt to desert shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1186, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 616, § 101, effective May 24.

28-3.1-510. Absence without leave.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs when he or she, without authority:

Fails to go to his or her appointed place of duty at the time prescribed;

Goes from that place; or

Absents himself or herself or remains absent from his or her unit, organization, or place of duty at which he or she is required to be at the time prescribed.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1187, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(c) amended, p. 617, § 102, effective May 24.

28-3.1-511. Missing movement.

Any person subject to this code who, through neglect or design, misses the movement of a ship, aircraft, or unit with which he or she is required in the course of duty to move must be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1187, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 617, § 103, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 749, § 20, effective April 2.

28-3.1-512. Contempt toward officials.

Any person subject to this code who uses contemptuous words against the president of the United States or the governor which may detrimentally affect the morale or effectiveness of any unit of the state military forces shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1187, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-513. Disrespect toward superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code who behaves with disrespect toward his or her superior commissioned officers shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1187, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 617, § 104, effective May 24.

28-3.1-514. Assaulting or willfully disobeying superior commissioned officer.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished by confinement of not more than ten years or such other punishment as a court-martial directs if he or she:

Strikes his or her superior commissioned officer or draws or lifts up any weapon or offers any violence against such officer while he or she is in the execution of his or her office; or

Willfully disobeys a lawful command of his or her superior commissioned officer.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1187, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 617, § 105, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 749, § 21, effective April 2.

28-3.1-515. Insubordinate conduct toward warrant officer or noncommissioned officer.

Any warrant officer or enlisted member shall be punished as a court-martial directs if he or she:

Strikes or assaults a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of his or her office; or

Willfully disobeys the lawful order of a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer; or

Treats with contempt or is disrespectful in language or deportment toward a warrant officer or noncommissioned officer while that officer is in the execution of his or her office.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1187, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (1)(c) amended, p. 617, § 106, effective May 24.

28-3.1-516. Failure to obey order or regulation.

Any person subject to this code who violates or fails to obey any lawful general order or regulation, including an order to report for state active duty, or is derelict in the performance of his or her duties shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 749, § 22, effective April 2.

28-3.1-517. Cruelty and maltreatment of inferiors.

Any person subject to this code who is guilty of cruelty toward, or oppression or maltreatment of, any person subject to his or her orders must be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 618, § 107, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 749, § 23, effective April 2.

28-3.1-518. Mutiny and sedition.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to usurp or override lawful military authority, refuses, in concert with any other person, to obey orders or otherwise do his or her duty or creates any violence or disturbance is guilty of mutiny.

Any such person who, with intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with any other person, revolt, violence, or other disturbance against such authority is guilty of sedition.

Any such person who fails to do his or her utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in his or her presence or fails to take all reasonable means to inform his or her superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition which he or she knows or has reason to believe is taking place, is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition.

Any person who is found guilty of attempted mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition shall be punished by confinement of not more than ten years or such other punishment as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 618, § 108, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(4) amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 749, § 24, effective April 2.

28-3.1-519. Resisting arrest - escape from custody.

Any person subject to this code who resists apprehension or breaks arrest or who escapes from physical restraint lawfully imposed shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-520. Unlawful release of prisoners.

Any person subject to this code who, without proper authority, releases any prisoner committed to his or her charge or who, through neglect or design, suffers any such prisoner to escape shall be punished as a court-martial directs, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 618, § 109, effective May 24.

28-3.1-521. Unlawful detention of another.

Any person subject to this code who, except as provided by law, apprehends, arrests, or confines any person shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-522. Noncompliance with procedural rules.

Any person subject to this code who is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of any case of a person accused of an offense under this code or knowingly and intentionally fails to enforce or comply with any provision of this code regulating the proceedings before, during, or after trial of an accused shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-523. Misbehavior before the enemy or any hostile force.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished by confinement of not more than ten years or such other punishment as a court-martial directs when he or she, before or in the presence of the enemy or any hostile force:

Runs away;

Abandons, surrenders, or delivers up any command, unit, place, or military property which it is his or her duty to defend;

Through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct, endangers the safety of any such command, unit, place, or military property;

Casts away his or her arms or ammunition;

Is guilty of cowardly conduct;

Quits his or her place of duty to plunder or pillage;

Causes false alarms in any command, unit, or place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the state military forces;

Willfully fails to do his or her utmost to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy any enemy troops, hostile forces, combatants, vessels, aircraft, or any other thing, which it is his or her duty so to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy; or

Does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to any troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the armed forces belonging to the United States or their allies or the state or to any other state, when engaged in battle.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1188, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

IP(1), (1)(b), (1)(d), (1)(f), and (1)(h) amended, p. 618, § 110, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

IP(1) amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 749, § 25, effective April 2.

28-3.1-524. Subordinate compelling surrender.

Any person subject to this code who compels or attempts to compel the commander of any of the state military forces to surrender to an enemy or any hostile force or who strikes the colors or flag to any enemy or any hostile force without proper authority shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1189, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-525. Improper use of countersign.

Any person subject to this code who discloses the parole or countersign to any person not entitled to receive it, or who gives to another who is entitled to receive and use the parole or countersign a different parole or countersign from that which, to his or her knowledge, he or she was authorized and required to give, shall be punished by confinement of not more than ten years or such other punishment as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1189, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 619, § 111, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 749, § 26, effective April 2.

28-3.1-526. Forcing a safeguard.

Any person subject to this code who forces a safeguard shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1189, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-527. Captured or abandoned property.

All persons subject to this code shall secure all property taken from the enemy or any hostile force and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in their possession, custody, or control.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs if he or she:

Fails to carry out the duties prescribed in subsection (1) of this section;

Buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of captured, stolen, or abandoned property whereby he or she receives or expects any profit, benefit, or advantage to himself or herself or another directly or indirectly connected with himself or herself; or

Engages in looting or pillaging.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1189, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

IP(2) and (2)(b) amended, p. 619, § 112, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 750, § 27, effective April 2.

28-3.1-528. Aiding the enemy or any hostile force.

Any person who aids or attempts to aid the enemy or any hostile force with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other thing or who without proper authority knowingly harbors, or protects, or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with, or holds any intercourse with the enemy or any hostile force, either directly or indirectly, shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1189, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-529. Misconduct of a prisoner.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs when he or she, while in the hands of the enemy or any hostile force:

For the purpose of securing favorable treatment by his or her captors, acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, or regulation, to the detriment of others held by the enemy or any hostile force as civilian or military prisoners; or

While in a position of authority over prisoners maltreats them without justifiable cause.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 619, § 113, effective May 24.

28-3.1-530. Falsification of official documents.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to deceive, signs any false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document knowing the same to be false or makes any other false official statement knowing the same to be false shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-531. Military property - loss, damage, destruction, or wrongful disposition.

Any person subject to this code who without proper authority sells or otherwise disposes of, willfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses, or willfully or through neglect suffers to be damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of any military property of the United States or of the state shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-532. Waste, spoilage, or destruction of property other than military.

Any person subject to this code who while on duty status willfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise willfully and wrongfully destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of the state shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-533. Driving while impaired - reckless driving.

Any person subject to this code who operates any vehicle while impaired by alcohol, marijuana, drugs, or intoxicants of any kind, or any combination thereof, or in a reckless or wanton manner shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 750, § 28, effective April 2.

28-3.1-534. Impaired on duty - leaving or sleeping on post.

Any person subject to this code who is found impaired by alcohol, marijuana, drugs, or intoxicants of any kind, or any combination thereof, on duty or sleeping upon his or her post or who leaves his or her post before he or she is regularly relieved shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 619, § 114, effective May 24.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 750, § 29, effective April 2.

28-3.1-535. Malingering.

Any person subject to this code who, for the purpose of avoiding work, duty, or service, feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse, or derangement or intentionally inflicts self-injury shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-536. Riot - breach of peace.

Any person subject to this code who causes or participates in any riot or breach of the peace shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-537. Provoking or reproachful words.

Any person subject to this code who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures towards any other person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1190, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-538. Larceny and wrongful appropriation.

Any person subject to this code who wrongfully takes, obtains, or withholds, by any means, from the possession of the owner or of any other person any money, personal property, or article of value of any kind: With intent permanently to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of property or to appropriate it to his or her own use or the use of any person other than the owner, is guilty of larceny; or, with intent temporarily to deprive or defraud another person of the use and benefit of property or to appropriate it to his or her own use or the use of any person other than the owner, is guilty of wrongful appropriation.

Any person found guilty of larceny or wrongful appropriation shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1191, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 619, § 115, effective May 24.

28-3.1-539. Robbery.

Any person subject to this code who with intent to steal takes anything of value from the person or in the presence of another against his or her will, by means of force or violence or fear of immediate or future injury to his or her person or property or to the person or property of a relative or member of his or her family or of anyone in his or her company at the time of the robbery, is guilty of robbery and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1191, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 116, effective May 24.

28-3.1-540. Forgery.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to defraud, falsely makes or alters any signature to any writing or any part thereof which would, if genuine, apparently impose a legal liability on another or change his or her legal right or liability to his or her prejudice or utters, offers, issues, or transfers such a writing, known to him or her to be so made or altered, is guilty of forgery and shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1191, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 117, effective May 24.

28-3.1-541. Maiming.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to injure, disfigure, or disable, inflicts upon the person of another an injury which seriously disfigures his or her person by any mutilation thereof, destroys or disables any member or organ of his or her body, or seriously diminishes his or her physical vigor by the injury of any member or organ is guilty of maiming and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1191, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 620, § 118, effective May 24.

28-3.1-542. Arson.

Any person subject to this code who willfully and maliciously burns or sets on fire an inhabited dwelling or any other structure, movable or immovable, wherein to the knowledge of the offender there is at the time a human being is guilty of aggravated arson and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Any person subject to this code who willfully and maliciously burns or sets fire to the property of another, except as provided in subsection (1) of this section, is guilty of simple arson and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1191, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-543. Extortion.

Any person subject to this code who communicates threats to another person with the intention thereby to obtain anything of value or any acquittance, advantage, or immunity is guilty of extortion and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1191, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-544. Assault.

Any person subject to this code who attempts or offers with unlawful force or violence to do bodily harm to another person, whether or not the attempt or offer is consummated, is guilty of assault and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Any person subject to this code who commits an assault with a dangerous weapon or other means or force likely to produce death or grievous bodily harm or commits an assault and intentionally inflicts grievous bodily harm with or without a weapon is guilty of aggravated assault and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1191, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-545. Burglary.

Any person subject to this code who, with intent to commit an offense punishable under this part 5, breaks and enters the dwelling house of another is guilty of burglary and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1192, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-546. Perjury.

Any person subject to this code who in a judicial proceeding or in a course of justice conducted under this code willfully gives, upon a lawful oath or in any form allowed by law to be substituted for an oath, any false testimony material to the issue or matter of inquiry is guilty of perjury and shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1192, § 1, effective June 10.

28-3.1-547. Frauds against the government.

Any person subject to this code shall be punished as a court-martial directs if he or she:

Knowing it to be false or fraudulent, makes any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof or presents to any person in the civil or military service, for approval or payment, any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof;

For the purpose of obtaining the approval, allowance, or payment of any claim against the United States, the state, or any officer thereof, makes or uses any writing or other paper knowing it to contain any false or fraudulent statements, makes any oath to any fact or to any writing or other paper knowing the oath to be false, or forges or counterfeits any signature upon any writing or other paper or uses any such signature knowing it to be forged or counterfeited;

Having charge, possession, custody, or control of any money or other property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the state military forces, knowingly delivers to any person having authority to receive it any amount thereof less than that for which he or she receives a certificate or receipt; or

Being authorized to make or deliver any paper certifying the receipt of any property of the United States or the state, furnished or intended for the armed forces of the United States or the state military forces, makes or delivers to any person such writing without having full knowledge of the truth of the statements therein contained and with intent to defraud the United States or the state.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1192, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2002:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended, p. 620, § 119, effective May 24.

28-3.1-548. Conduct unbecoming an officer.

Any commissioned officer, cadet, or candidate who is convicted of conduct unbecoming an officer shall be punished as a court-martial directs.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1192, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 750, § 30, effective April 2.

28-3.1-549. Cognizance of disreputable conduct.

Though not specifically mentioned in this code, all disorders and neglects to the prejudice of good order and discipline in the state military forces and all conduct of a nature to bring discredit upon the state military forces, of which persons subject to this code may be guilty, shall be taken cognizance of by a general, special, or summary court-martial, according to the nature and degree of the offense, and shall be punished at the discretion of such court. However, cognizance may not be taken of, and jurisdiction may not be extended to, any offense which constitutes a felony under the laws of this state where the local prosecuting authority has initiated a criminal action against the accused in the same matter. Where such an action has not been initiated against the accused, trial counsel shall give notice to the local prosecuting authority that a court-martial has taken cognizance of the offense and shall certify to the court-martial that such notice was given.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article added, p. 1192, § 1, effective June 10.

L. 86:

Entire section amended, p. 1015, § 4, effective July 1.

28-3.1-550. Controlled substances - wrongful use - possession - transfer.

Any person subject to this code who wrongfully uses, possesses, manufactures, distributes, imports into the customs territory of the United States, exports from the United States, or introduces into an installation, vessel, vehicle, or aircraft used by or under the control of the armed forces of the United States or of the military forces of any state a substance described in subsection (2) of this section must be punished as a court-martial may direct.

The substances referred to in subsection (1) of this section are the following:

Opium, heroin, cocaine, amphetamine, lysergic acid diethylamide, methamphetamine, phencyclidine, barbituric acid, and marijuana and any compound or derivative of any such substance;

Any substance not specified in subsection (2)(a) of this section that is listed on a schedule of controlled substances prescribed by the president of the United States for the purposes of the federal "Uniform Code of Military Justice", 10 U.S.C. sec. 801 et seq., as amended; and

Any other substance that is listed in schedules I through V of article 202 of the federal "Controlled Substances Act", 21 U.S.C. sec. 812, as amended.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire section added, (SB 18-135), ch. 95, p. 750, § 31, effective April 2.